Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.070

Job sharing.

Effective December 31, 1995, school and educational service districts shall have a policy on the sharing of jobs by district employees.

[ 1995 c 335 s 701; 1989 c 206 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.58.580.]

NOTES:

Part headings, table of contents not law—1995 c 335: See note following RCW 28A.150.360.